District of Columbia statutes.
2-1323

Qualifications for membership.

Members shall be appointed with due consideration for representation from established public, nonprofit, and voluntary community organizations and agencies concerned with the Latino community and members of the general public who have given evidence of particular dedication to, and knowledge of, the needs of the Latino community. The membership of the Commission shall have at least 2 resident aliens.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 403, 23 DCR 2543
1981 Ed., § 1-2323.
1973 Ed., § 6-1923.